Massachusetts, session 194th, SD3313.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Chapter 94 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024 Official Edition, 
is hereby amended by adding the following section:- 
Section 330. (a) For the purposes of this section, the following words shall have the 
following meanings unless the context clearly requires otherwise: 
“Ingredient”, an intentionally added substance present in a diaper. 
“Manufacturer”, (i) a person or entity that manufactures a diaper product and whose 
name appears on the product label; or (ii) a person or entity for whom the diaper product is 
manufactured or distributed, as identified on the product label pursuant to 15 U.S.C. section 1451 
et seq. 
“Diaper”, a type of garment or product inserted into a garment for the purpose of 
absorbing waste products to prevent soiling of outer clothing or the external environment without 
the use of a toilet. These products may be either disposable or reusable. 

of 2 13  (b) Each package or box containing diapers sold in the Commonwealth shall contain a 
plain and conspicuous printed list of all ingredients which shall be listed in order of 
predominance. Such list shall either be printed on the package or affixed thereto. 
(c) The requirements of this section shall apply in addition to any other labeling 
requirements established pursuant to any other provision of law. 
(d) Whenever a violation of this section has occurred, a civil penalty of one percent of the 
manufacturer's total annual in-state sales not to exceed one thousand dollars per package or box 
shall be imposed on the manufacturer. 
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.